Hawaii statutes.
§480E-3 Distressed property
consultant contract. (a) A distressed property consultant contract shall
be in writing and shall fully disclose all services to be performed by the
distressed property consultant and all terms of any agreements between the distressed
property consultant and all distressed property owners, including the total
amount and terms of compensation to be directly or indirectly received by the
distressed property consultant.

(b) A distressed property consultant contract
shall contain on its first page in a type size no smaller than fourteen-point
boldface type:

(1) A description of the distressed property;

(2) The name, street address, and telephone number of
the distressed property consultant; and

(3) The name and address of the distressed property
consultant to which notice of cancellation is to be delivered.

(c) A distressed property consultant contract
shall be dated and signed by the distressed property consultant. If the
distressed property consultant is a person other than an individual, the
individual executing the distressed property consultant contract on behalf of
the distressed property consultant shall identify the title and office held by
the individual.

(d) A distressed property consultant contract
shall be dated and signed by all distressed property owners.

(e) A distressed property consultant contract
shall disclose the following information, and shall be substantially in the
following form and printed in not less than fourteen-point type:

"You may stop doing business with us at any
time. You may accept or reject the offer of mortgage assistance we obtain from
your lender (or servicer). If you reject the offer, you do not have to pay
us. If you accept the offer, you will have to pay us [insert amount or method
of calculating the amount] for our services.

[Name of the company] is not associated with the
government, and our service is not approved by the government or your lender.

Even if you agree to use our service in an
attempt to obtain mortgage assistance relief from the lending party, your
lender may not agree to change your loan.

IF YOU STOP PAYING YOUR MORTGAGE, YOU COULD LOSE
YOUR HOME AND DAMAGE YOUR CREDIT RATING."

For the purposes of this subsection, the amount
"you will have to pay" shall consist of the total amount the consumer
must pay to purchase, receive, and use all of the mortgage assistance relief
services that are the subject of the sales offer, including but not limited to
all fees and charges.

(f) The distressed property consultant shall
provide each distressed property owner with a copy of the distressed property
consultant contract and attached notice of cancellation immediately upon
execution by all parties to the distressed property consultant contract. A
distressed property consultant contract shall not be effective until all
parties to the distressed property consultant contract have signed the
contract.

(g) For forms of mortgage assistance relief
that can only be obtained from a lending party, the objective of every such distressed
property consultant contract shall be to obtain from the lending party a
written offer to the distressed property owner for mortgage assistance relief
on terms acceptable to the property owners. Any such agreement with the
lending party for mortgage assistance relief shall be in writing, and shall
become binding upon the distressed property owners only after all property
owners have accepted the offer by executing the written contract.[L 2008, c
137, pt of §2; am L 2016, c 142, §5]

Previous
Vol11_Ch0476-0490
Next